Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.060

Engineer to maintain records of expenditures for equipment, etc.—Inventory—Physical archival—Public availability.

The county road engineer shall maintain and has authority over complete and accurate records of all expenditures for (1) administration, (2) bond and warrant retirement, (3) maintenance, (4) construction, (5) purchase and operation of road equipment, and (6) purchase or manufacture of materials and supplies, and shall maintain a true and complete inventory of all road equipment. Records may be physically archived with other county records that are available to the public. The state auditor, with the advice and assistance of the county road administration board, shall prescribe forms and types of records to be maintained by the county road engineers.

[ 2016 c 19 s 7; 2009 c 549 s 4135; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 10; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.060. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8b.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 19: See note following RCW 36.87.120.